District of Columbia statutes.
10-1104.02

Insurance requirements.

The Mayor shall, in connection with authorizing the use of any public space under the authority of this subchapter, require the person authorized to use such space, prior to any such use, to secure a policy of public liability and property damage insurance or other acceptable security providing for such minimum limits of liability as may be required by the Mayor. Any such insurance policy shall include the District and its officers and employees as additional parties insured and shall be cancellable only after 30 days written notice of such cancellation has been received by the Mayor. No such use of public space shall be authorized or continued for any period unless such insurance or other security is maintained in full force and effect during that period. Nothing herein contained shall be construed as requiring either the United States or the District to secure a policy of public liability and property damage insurance or other security covering any use of public space by either of the said governments under the authority of this subchapter.

History

Oct. 17, 1968, 82 Stat. 1162, Pub. L. 90-596, title IV, § 402

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 7-1017.
1973 Ed., § 7-918.

Change in Government

This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to the District of Columbia Council and to a Commissioner of the District of Columbia. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.